Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.742

Federal employment retirement income act liability—Prohibition on state-based retirement plan for nonstate employees.

The department shall not expose the state of Washington as an employer or through administration of the marketplace to any potential liability under the federal employee retirement income [security] act of 1974. As such, the department is specifically prohibited from offering and operating a state-based retirement plan for businesses or individuals who are not employed by the state of Washington.

[ 2015 c 296 s 6.]